Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated  to the Department of Revenue, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 29,682,894
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 17,735,223
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 80,145,888
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 23,595,685
(5) Corporate Division .................... $ 1
(6) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 41,612,257
(7) Nonprofit Housing program ...... $ 3,348,966
(8) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 15,066,620
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous  Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section,  collected or received by the Department of Revenue, for the
following purposes:
(1) Administration..........................  $ 8,045,265
(2) Property Tax Division ............... $ 43,773,022
(3) Personal Tax and Compliance
Division..................................... $ 1,856,993
(4) Business Division ...................... $ 11,936,908
(5) Collections Division................... $ 13,385,580
(6) Corporate Division .................... $ 1
(7) Information Technology
Services Division....................... $ 7,046,683
(8) Marijuana program ................... $ 4,466,442
(9) Senior Property Tax
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 1
Deferral program...................... $ 33,773,047
(10) Core systems replacement ........ $ 535,000
(11) Debt service and
related costs ............................. $ 1,237,830
SECTION 3. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on July 1, 2019.
Passed by House June 17, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 2